Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1548.04
Gross proceeds, defined.

Gross proceeds shall mean the total receipts from all sales less expenditures for the purchase of any item in this state for the purpose of recycling such item.

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 8.
October 30, 2015